Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF627.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GEORGE STOPPEL FARMSTEAD REHABILITATION.new text end new text begin $850,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the governing board of the Minnesota Historical Society for a grant to Olmsted County Historical Society to rehabilitate the historic George Stoppel stone house and barn and to construct an accessible pathway to the farmstead. The George Stoppel farmstead is listed on the National Register of Historic Places and owned by the Olmsted County Historical Society. All work must follow the standards outlined in the United States Secretary of the Interior's Treatment of Historic Properties. new text end